Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-6,340
Operation by person under sixteen years of age; restrictions.

(1) No person under the age of sixteen years shall operate a snowmobile in this state unless accompanied by a parent, guardian, or other person over eighteen years of age.

(2) The operator of a snowmobile shall not be required to hold an operator's license.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 18;

Laws 1977, LB 230, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2018;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 436;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 63.
July 18, 2026